Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.410

Alternatives to suspension—Encouraged.

School districts are encouraged to find alternatives to suspension including reducing the length of a student's suspension conditioned by the commencement of counseling or other treatment services. Consistent with current law, the conditioning of a student's suspension does not obligate the school district to pay for the counseling or other treatment services except for those stipulated and agreed to by the district at the inception of the suspension.

[ 1992 c 155 s 1.]